Utah statutes.
58-40a-303.   Scope of practice.

An athletic trainer may:

(1)  prevent injuries by:

(a)  designing and implementing physical conditioning programs, which may include:

(i)  strength and range of motion testing;

(ii)  nutritional advisement; and

(iii)  psychosocial intervention and referral;

(b)  performing preparticipation screening;

(c)  fitting protective equipment;

(d)  designing and constructing protective products; and

(e)  continuously monitoring changes in the environment;

(2)  recognize and evaluate injuries by:

(a)  obtaining a history of the injury;

(b)  inspecting an injured body part and associated structures;

(c)  palpating bony landmarks and soft tissue structures; and

(d)  performing clinical tests to determine the extent of an injury;

(3)  provide immediate care of injuries by:

(a)  initiating cardiopulmonary resuscitation;

(b)  administering basic or advanced first aid;

(c)  removing athletic equipment; and

(d)  immobilizing and transporting an injured athlete;

(4)  determine whether an athlete may return to participation or, if the injury requires further definitive care, refer the athlete to the appropriate directing physician;

(5)  rehabilitate and recondition an injury by administering therapeutic exercise and therapeutic and physical modalities, including cryotherapy, thermotherapy, and intermittent compression, electrical stimulation, ultra sound, traction devices, or mechanical devices as directed by established, written athletic training service plans or protocols or upon the order of a directing physician;

(6)  provide athletic training services administration, including:

(a)  implementing athletic training service plans or protocols;

(b)  writing organizational policies and procedures;

(c)  complying with governmental and institutional standards; and

(d)  maintaining records to document services rendered; and

(7)  educate athletes to facilitate physical conditioning and reconditioning by designing and implementing appropriate programs to minimize the risk of injury.

